District of Columbia statutes.
50-301.10

Internal and procedural rules.

(a)

The Commission shall establish rules for the general conduct of its organizational affairs and shall establish rules of procedure of general applicability consistent with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.]. These rules shall include specific guidelines to implement due process requirements.

(b)

The proposed rules shall comply with any requirements imposed upon the Commission by subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.].

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 11, 33 DCR 703
May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-109, § 2(f), 35 DCR 2181
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(k), 59 DCR 9431
1981 Ed., § 40-1710.
2001 Ed., § 50-310.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-184 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.